Utah statutes.
23-19-24.   Resident hunting license -- Use of fee.

(1)  A resident, after paying the fee established by the Wildlife Board, may obtain a hunting license.

(2)  A hunting license authorizes the licensee to, according to this title and the Wildlife Board's rules and proclamations:

(a)  take small game; and

(b)  apply for or obtain a big game, cougar, bear, or turkey hunting permit.

(3)  Up to $1 of the hunting license fee may be used for the hunter education program.

(4) (a)  Up to 50 cents of the hunting license fee may be used for the upland game program to:

(i)  acquire pen-raised birds; or

(ii)  capture and transplant upland game species.

(b)  The hunting license fee revenue designated for the upland game program by Subsection (4)(a) is in addition to any hunting license fee revenue that may be used for the upland game program as provided by Sections 23-19-43 and 23-19-47.

